apertium-fo-is.fo.dix
    <pardef n="mun/ur__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ur</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urin</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inum</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arins</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irnir</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irnar</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unum</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/at__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ati</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ats</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øt</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øt</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øtum</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ata</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atið</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atið</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atinum</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atsins</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øtini</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øtini</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øtunum</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atanna</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/onur__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onur</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oni</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onar</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ynir</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ynir</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onum</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ona</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onurin</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onin</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oninum</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onarins</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ynirnir</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ynirnar</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onunum</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onanna</l>
          <r>onur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="munur"><i>mun</i><par n="mun/ur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fat"><i>f</i><par n="f/at__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="háttur"><i>hátt</i><par n="mun/ur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sonur"><i>s</i><par n="s/onur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ítróttur"><i>ítrótt</i><par n="mun/ur__n_m"/></e>
